test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-siiedw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - sīedõ: # Verb 7 'eng /est süüa/fin' - full paradigm
     sīedõ+V+TV+Inf: sīedõ
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ger: sīedsõ
     sīedõ+V+TV+Sup: sīemõ
     sīedõ+V+TV+Sup+Ine: sīemõs
     sīedõ+V+TV+Sup+Ela: sīemõst
     sīedõ+V+TV+Sup+Tra: sīemõks
     sīedõ+V+TV+Sup+Abe: sīemõt
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sīeb
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sīetõ
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sīebõd
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sei
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seitõ
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seitõ
     sīedõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: sīe
     sīedõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg3: sīeks
     sīedõ+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: sīe
     sīedõ+V+TV+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: sīe
     sīedõ+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: sīegid
     sīedõ+V+TV+Jus+Sg3: sīegõ
     sīedõ+V+TV+QuoSg3: sēji
     sīedõ+V+TV+ActPrfPrc: sīend
     sīedõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc: sīedõd
